Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1440XS (4) 91 lh/ko S.F. 433 Section 1. DIRECT ACTING ANTIVIRAL MEDICATION ââ MEDICAID 1 PRIOR AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding section 249A.20A, 2 subsection 4, the department of health and human services shall 3 not require prior authorization for any direct acting antiviral 4 medications used to treat hepatitis C that are on the preferred 5 drug list. 6 Sec. 2. IOWA MEDICAL ASSISTANCE DRUG UTILIZATION REVIEW 7 COMMISSION ââ VOSEVI REVIEW. The Iowa medical assistance drug 8 utilization review commission created under section 249A.24 9 shall, by July 1, 2026, review the prescription drug vosevi for 10 placement on the preferred drug formulary pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 11 Â§1396r-8 as a preferred direct acting antiviral for treatment 12 of hepatitis C. 13